Tennessee, session 114, SB0081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (35).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Second look commission, created by § 37-3-803;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0081
000340
- 1 -